Illinois, session 104th, HB1128.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 5amended by changing Sections 4 and 8 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 65/4)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-4)7    Sec. 4. Application for Firearm Owner's Identification 8Cards. 9    (a) Each applicant for a Firearm Owner's Identification 10Card must: 11        (1) Submit an application as made available by the 12    Illinois State Police; and13        (2) Submit evidence to the Illinois State Police that:14            (i) This subparagraph (i) applies through the 15        180th day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date 16        of Public Act 101-80). He or she is 21 years of age or 17        over, or if he or she is under 21 years of age that he 18        or she has the written consent of his or her parent or 19        legal guardian to possess and acquire firearms and 20        firearm ammunition and that he or she has never been 21        convicted of a misdemeanor other than a traffic 22        offense or adjudged delinquent, provided, however, 23        that such parent or legal guardian is not an   HB1128- 2 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1        individual prohibited from having a Firearm Owner's 2        Identification Card and files an affidavit with the 3        Department as prescribed by the Department stating 4        that he or she is not an individual prohibited from 5        having a Card;6            (i-5) This subparagraph (i-5) applies on and after 7        the 181st day following July 12, 2019 (the effective 8        date of Public Act 101-80). He or she is 18 21 years of 9        age or over, or if he or she is under 18 21 years of 10        age that he or she has never been convicted of a 11        misdemeanor other than a traffic offense or adjudged 12        delinquent and is an active duty member of the United 13        States Armed Forces or the Illinois National Guard or 14        has the written consent of his or her parent or legal 15        guardian to possess and acquire firearms and firearm 16        ammunition, provided, however, that, if the applicant 17        is under 18 years of age, the such parent or legal 18        guardian is not an individual prohibited from having a 19        Firearm Owner's Identification Card and files an 20        affidavit with the Illinois State Police as prescribed 21        by the Illinois State Police stating that he or she is 22        not an individual prohibited from having a Card or the 23        active duty member of the United States Armed Forces 24        or the Illinois National Guard under 18 21 years of age 25        annually submits proof to the Illinois State Police, 26        in a manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police;   HB1128- 3 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1            (i-6) If he or she is under 21 years of age, that 2        he or she has never been convicted of a misdemeanor 3        other than a traffic offense or adjudged delinquent; 4            (ii) He or she has not been convicted of a felony 5        under the laws of this or any other jurisdiction;6            (iii) He or she is not addicted to narcotics;7            (iv) He or she has not been a patient in a mental 8        health facility within the past 5 years or, if he or 9        she has been a patient in a mental health facility more 10        than 5 years ago submit the certification required 11        under subsection (u) of Section 8 of this Act;12            (v) He or she is not a person with an intellectual 13        disability;14            (vi) He or she is not a noncitizen who is 15        unlawfully present in the United States under the laws 16        of the United States;17            (vii) He or she is not subject to an existing order 18        of protection prohibiting him or her from possessing a 19        firearm;20            (viii) He or she has not been convicted within the 21        past 5 years of battery, assault, aggravated assault, 22        violation of an order of protection, or a 23        substantially similar offense in another jurisdiction, 24        in which a firearm was used or possessed;25            (ix) He or she has not been convicted of domestic 26        battery, aggravated domestic battery, or a   HB1128- 4 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1        substantially similar offense in another jurisdiction 2        committed before, on or after January 1, 2012 (the 3        effective date of Public Act 97-158). If the applicant 4        knowingly and intelligently waives the right to have 5        an offense described in this clause (ix) tried by a 6        jury, and by guilty plea or otherwise, results in a 7        conviction for an offense in which a domestic 8        relationship is not a required element of the offense 9        but in which a determination of the applicability of 10        18 U.S.C. 922(g)(9) is made under Section 112A-11.1 of 11        the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, an entry by the 12        court of a judgment of conviction for that offense 13        shall be grounds for denying the issuance of a Firearm 14        Owner's Identification Card under this Section;15            (x) (Blank);16            (xi) He or she is not a noncitizen who has been 17        admitted to the United States under a non-immigrant 18        visa (as that term is defined in Section 101(a)(26) of 19        the Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. 20        1101(a)(26))), or that he or she is a noncitizen who 21        has been lawfully admitted to the United States under 22        a non-immigrant visa if that noncitizen is:23                (1) admitted to the United States for lawful 24            hunting or sporting purposes;25                (2) an official representative of a foreign 26            government who is:  HB1128- 5 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1                    (A) accredited to the United States 2                Government or the Government's mission to an 3                international organization having its 4                headquarters in the United States; or5                    (B) en route to or from another country to 6                which that noncitizen is accredited;7                (3) an official of a foreign government or 8            distinguished foreign visitor who has been so 9            designated by the Department of State;10                (4) a foreign law enforcement officer of a 11            friendly foreign government entering the United 12            States on official business; or13                (5) one who has received a waiver from the 14            Attorney General of the United States pursuant to 15            18 U.S.C. 922(y)(3);16            (xii) He or she is not a minor subject to a 17        petition filed under Section 5-520 of the Juvenile 18        Court Act of 1987 alleging that the minor is a 19        delinquent minor for the commission of an offense that 20        if committed by an adult would be a felony;21            (xiii) He or she is not an adult who had been 22        adjudicated a delinquent minor under the Juvenile 23        Court Act of 1987 for the commission of an offense that 24        if committed by an adult would be a felony;25            (xiv) He or she is a resident of the State of 26        Illinois;   HB1128- 6 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1            (xv) He or she has not been adjudicated as a person 2        with a mental disability; 3            (xvi) He or she has not been involuntarily 4        admitted into a mental health facility; and 5            (xvii) He or she is not a person with a 6        developmental disability; and 7        (3) Upon request by the Illinois State Police, sign a 8    release on a form prescribed by the Illinois State Police 9    waiving any right to confidentiality and requesting the 10    disclosure to the Illinois State Police of limited mental 11    health institution admission information from another 12    state, the District of Columbia, any other territory of 13    the United States, or a foreign nation concerning the 14    applicant for the sole purpose of determining whether the 15    applicant is or was a patient in a mental health 16    institution and disqualified because of that status from 17    receiving a Firearm Owner's Identification Card. No mental 18    health care or treatment records may be requested. The 19    information received shall be destroyed within one year of 20    receipt.21    (a-5) Each applicant for a Firearm Owner's Identification 22Card who is over the age of 18 shall furnish to the Illinois 23State Police either his or her Illinois driver's license 24number or Illinois Identification Card number, except as 25provided in subsection (a-10).26    (a-10) Each applicant for a Firearm Owner's Identification   HB1128- 7 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1Card, who is employed as a law enforcement officer, an armed 2security officer in Illinois, or by the United States Military 3permanently assigned in Illinois and who is not an Illinois 4resident, shall furnish to the Illinois State Police his or 5her driver's license number or state identification card 6number from his or her state of residence. The Illinois State 7Police may adopt rules to enforce the provisions of this 8subsection (a-10).9    (a-15) If an applicant applying for a Firearm Owner's 10Identification Card moves from the residence address named in 11the application, he or she shall immediately notify in a form 12and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police of that 13change of address.14    (a-20) Each applicant for a Firearm Owner's Identification 15Card shall furnish to the Illinois State Police his or her 16photograph. An applicant who is 18 21 years of age or older 17seeking a religious exemption to the photograph requirement 18must furnish with the application an approved copy of United 19States Department of the Treasury Internal Revenue Service 20Form 4029. In lieu of a photograph, an applicant regardless of 21age seeking a religious exemption to the photograph 22requirement shall submit fingerprints on a form and manner 23prescribed by the Illinois State Police with his or her 24application. 25    (a-25) Beginning January 1, 2023, each applicant for the 26issuance of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card may include   HB1128- 8 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1a full set of his or her fingerprints in electronic format to 2the Illinois State Police, unless the applicant has previously 3provided a full set of his or her fingerprints to the Illinois 4State Police under this Act or the Firearm Concealed Carry 5Act.6    The fingerprints must be transmitted through a live scan 7fingerprint vendor licensed by the Department of Financial and 8Professional Regulation. The fingerprints shall be checked 9against the fingerprint records now and hereafter filed in the 10Illinois State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation 11criminal history records databases, including all available 12State and local criminal history record information files.13    The Illinois State Police shall charge applicants a 14one-time fee for conducting the criminal history record check, 15which shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund 16and shall not exceed the actual cost of the State and national 17criminal history record check.18    (a-26) The Illinois State Police shall research, explore, 19and report to the General Assembly by January 1, 2022 on the 20feasibility of permitting voluntarily submitted fingerprints 21obtained for purposes other than Firearm Owner's 22Identification Card enforcement that are contained in the 23Illinois State Police database for purposes of this Act. 24    (b) Each application form shall include the following 25statement printed in bold type: "Warning: Entering false 26information on an application for a Firearm Owner's   HB1128- 9 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1Identification Card is punishable as a Class 2 felony in 2accordance with subsection (d-5) of Section 14 of the Firearm 3Owners Identification Card Act.".4    (c) Upon such written consent, pursuant to Section 4, 5paragraph (a)(2)(i), the parent or legal guardian giving the 6consent shall be liable for any damages resulting from the 7applicant's use of firearms or firearm ammunition.8(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 9102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 105-27-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 11    (430 ILCS 65/8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-8)12    Sec. 8. Grounds for denial and revocation. The Illinois 13State Police has authority to deny an application for or to 14revoke and seize a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 15previously issued under this Act only if the Illinois State 16Police finds that the applicant or the person to whom such card 17was issued is or was at the time of issuance:18        (a) A person under 21 years of age who has been 19    convicted of a misdemeanor other than a traffic offense or 20    adjudged delinquent;21        (b) This subsection (b) applies through the 180th day 22    following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 23    101-80). A person under 21 years of age who does not have 24    the written consent of his parent or guardian to acquire 25    and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or whose   HB1128- 10 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1    parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, or 2    where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 3    Firearm Owner's Identification Card;4        (b-5) This subsection (b-5) applies on and after the 5    181st day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of 6    Public Act 101-80). A person under 18 21 years of age who 7    is not an active duty member of the United States Armed 8    Forces or the Illinois National Guard and does not have 9    the written consent of his or her parent or guardian to 10    acquire and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or 11    whose parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, 12    or where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 13    Firearm Owner's Identification Card; 14        (c) A person convicted of a felony under the laws of 15    this or any other jurisdiction;16        (d) A person addicted to narcotics;17        (e) A person who has been a patient of a mental health 18    facility within the past 5 years or a person who has been a 19    patient in a mental health facility more than 5 years ago 20    who has not received the certification required under 21    subsection (u) of this Section. An active law enforcement 22    officer employed by a unit of government or a Department 23    of Corrections employee authorized to possess firearms who 24    is denied, revoked, or has his or her Firearm Owner's 25    Identification Card seized under this subsection (e) may 26    obtain relief as described in subsection (c-5) of Section   HB1128- 11 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1    10 of this Act if the officer or employee did not act in a 2    manner threatening to the officer or employee, another 3    person, or the public as determined by the treating 4    clinical psychologist or physician, and the officer or 5    employee seeks mental health treatment;6        (f) A person whose mental condition is of such a 7    nature that it poses a clear and present danger to the 8    applicant, any other person or persons, or the community;9        (g) A person who has an intellectual disability;10        (h) A person who intentionally makes a false statement 11    in the Firearm Owner's Identification Card application or 12    endorsement affidavit;13        (i) A noncitizen who is unlawfully present in the 14    United States under the laws of the United States;15        (i-5) A noncitizen who has been admitted to the United 16    States under a non-immigrant visa (as that term is defined 17    in Section 101(a)(26) of the Immigration and Nationality 18    Act (8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(26))), except that this subsection 19    (i-5) does not apply to any noncitizen who has been 20    lawfully admitted to the United States under a 21    non-immigrant visa if that noncitizen is:22            (1) admitted to the United States for lawful 23        hunting or sporting purposes;24            (2) an official representative of a foreign 25        government who is:26                (A) accredited to the United States Government   HB1128- 12 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1            or the Government's mission to an international 2            organization having its headquarters in the United 3            States; or4                (B) en route to or from another country to 5            which that noncitizen is accredited;6            (3) an official of a foreign government or 7        distinguished foreign visitor who has been so 8        designated by the Department of State;9            (4) a foreign law enforcement officer of a 10        friendly foreign government entering the United States 11        on official business; or12            (5) one who has received a waiver from the 13        Attorney General of the United States pursuant to 18 14        U.S.C. 922(y)(3);15        (j) (Blank);16        (k) A person who has been convicted within the past 5 17    years of battery, assault, aggravated assault, violation 18    of an order of protection, or a substantially similar 19    offense in another jurisdiction, in which a firearm was 20    used or possessed;21        (l) A person who has been convicted of domestic 22    battery, aggravated domestic battery, or a substantially 23    similar offense in another jurisdiction committed before, 24    on or after January 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public 25    Act 97-158). If the applicant or person who has been 26    previously issued a Firearm Owner's Identification Card   HB1128- 13 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1    under this Act knowingly and intelligently waives the 2    right to have an offense described in this paragraph (l) 3    tried by a jury, and by guilty plea or otherwise, results 4    in a conviction for an offense in which a domestic 5    relationship is not a required element of the offense but 6    in which a determination of the applicability of 18 U.S.C. 7    922(g)(9) is made under Section 112A-11.1 of the Code of 8    Criminal Procedure of 1963, an entry by the court of a 9    judgment of conviction for that offense shall be grounds 10    for denying an application for and for revoking and 11    seizing a Firearm Owner's Identification Card previously 12    issued to the person under this Act;13        (m) (Blank);14        (n) A person who is prohibited from acquiring or 15    possessing firearms or firearm ammunition by any Illinois 16    State statute or by federal law;17        (o) A minor subject to a petition filed under Section 18    5-520 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 alleging that the 19    minor is a delinquent minor for the commission of an 20    offense that if committed by an adult would be a felony; 21        (p) An adult who had been adjudicated a delinquent 22    minor under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for the 23    commission of an offense that if committed by an adult 24    would be a felony;25        (q) A person who is not a resident of the State of 26    Illinois, except as provided in subsection (a-10) of   HB1128- 14 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1    Section 4; 2        (r) A person who has been adjudicated as a person with 3    a mental disability; 4        (s) A person who has been found to have a 5    developmental disability; 6        (t) A person involuntarily admitted into a mental 7    health facility; or 8        (u) A person who has had his or her Firearm Owner's 9    Identification Card revoked or denied under subsection (e) 10    of this Section or item (iv) of paragraph (2) of 11    subsection (a) of Section 4 of this Act because he or she 12    was a patient in a mental health facility as provided in 13    subsection (e) of this Section, shall not be permitted to 14    obtain a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, after the 15    5-year period has lapsed, unless he or she has received a 16    mental health evaluation by a physician, clinical 17    psychologist, or qualified examiner as those terms are 18    defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 19    Disabilities Code, and has received a certification that 20    he or she is not a clear and present danger to himself, 21    herself, or others. The physician, clinical psychologist, 22    or qualified examiner making the certification and his or 23    her employer shall not be held criminally, civilly, or 24    professionally liable for making or not making the 25    certification required under this subsection, except for 26    willful or wanton misconduct. This subsection does not   HB1128- 15 -LRB104 03616 RLC 13640 b1    apply to a person whose firearm possession rights have 2    been restored through administrative or judicial action 3    under Section 10 or 11 of this Act. 4    Upon revocation of a person's Firearm Owner's 5Identification Card, the Illinois State Police shall provide 6notice to the person and the person shall comply with Section 79.5 of this Act. 8(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 9102-645, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 105-27-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.)